natural-language-processing/morphology_fun_with_foma/jp.lexc
!!!jp.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +V +J +TE +TA

LEXICON Root

Verb ;
Adj ;

LEXICON Verb

かう        Vinf;
いう        Vinf;
ぬう        Vinf;
かつ        Vinf;
よむ        Vinf;
のむ        Vinf;
よぶ        Vinf;
ぬすむ      Vinf;
かく        Vinf;
いく        Vinf;
およぐ      Vinf;
はなす      Vinf;
たべる      Vinf;
おしえる    Vinf;
いきる      Vinf;
ねる        Vinf;

LEXICON Adj

たかい      Jinf;
あつい      Jinf;
さむい      Jinf;
かゆい      Jinf;
ふとい      Jinf;
ちかい      Jinf;
おもい      Jinf;
はやい      Jinf;
あたらしい  Jinf;
ふるい      Jinf;

LEXICON Vinf

+V:0        #;
+V+TE:^TE   #;
+V+TA:^TA   #;

LEXICON Jinf

+J:0        #;
+J+TE:^TE   #;
+J+TA:^TA   #;
